test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-puu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pū: # Noun 12 'eng /est puu/fin' - full paradigm
     pū+N+Sg+Nom: pū
     pū+N+Sg+Gen: pū
     pū+N+Sg+Par: pūdõ
     pū+N+Sg+Dat: pūn
     pū+N+Sg+Ins: pūkõks
     pū+N+Sg+Ill: [pūʼzõ, pūzõ]
     pū+N+Sg+Ela: pūstõ
     pū+N+Pl+Nom: pūd
     pū+N+Pl+Gen: pūd 
     pū+N+Pl+Par: pūḑi
     pū+N+Pl+Dat: pūdõn
     pū+N+Pl+Ins: pūdkõks
     pū+N+Pl+Ill: [pūʼži, pūži]
     pū+N+Pl+Ela: pūšti
